Alaska statutes. Title 41. Public Resources.
Chapter 08. Geological and Geophysical Surveys.

Collateral references. —

63C Am. Jur. 2d, Public Lands, §§ 14-24.

73B C.J.S., Public Lands, §§ 29-44.

Recovery for unauthorized exploration or survey. 67 ALR2d 444.

Sec. 41.08.010.
Division of geological and geophysical surveys.

There is established in the department a division of geological and geophysical surveys under the direction of the state geologist.

History.

(§ 1 ch 93 SLA 1972)

Sec. 41.08.015.
State geologist.

The commissioner shall appoint the state geologist, who must be qualified by education and experience to direct the activities of the division.

History.

(§ 1 ch 93 SLA 1972)

Sec. 41.08.017.
Hydrological and seismic hazard data declared to be of public interest.

Systematic collection, recording, evaluation, and distribution of data on the quantity, location, and quality of water of the state in the ground, on the surface of the ground, or along the coasts, are in the public interest and necessary to the orderly domestic and industrial development of the state.

Systematic collection, evaluation, archival, and distribution of geologic data and information on earthquakes, volcanic eruptions, and engineering geology and identification of potential seismic, volcanic, and other geological hazards throughout the state are in the public interest and necessary to orderly, safely, and cost-effective development in the state.

History.

(§ 1 ch 41 SLA 1977; am § 1 ch 101 SLA 1983; am § 3 ch 36 SLA 1987)

Sec. 41.08.020.
Powers and duties.

The state geologist shall conduct geological and geophysical surveys to determine the potential of Alaskan land for production of metals, minerals, fuels, and geothermal resources; the locations and supplies of groundwater and construction materials; the potential geologic hazards to buildings, roads, bridges, and other installations and structures; and shall conduct such other surveys and investigations as will advance knowledge of the geology of the state. With the approval of the commissioner, the state geologist may acquire, by gift or purchase, geological and geophysical reports, surveys, and similar information.

In addition, the division of geological and geophysical surveys shall:

collect, record, evaluate, and distribute data on the quantity, quality, and location of underground, surface, and coastal water of the state;

publish or have published data on the water of the state;

require the filing with it of the results and findings of surveys of water quality, quantity, and location;

require of water well contractors, the filing with it of basic water and aquifer data normally obtained, including but not limited to well location, estimated elevation, well driller’s logs, pumping tests and flow measurements, and water quality determinations;

accept and spend funds for the purposes of this section, AS

41.08.017

, and

41.08.035

and enter into agreements with individuals, public or private agencies, communities, private industry, state agencies, and agencies of the federal government;

collect, evaluate, and distribute geologic data on seismic events and engineering geology of the state;

identify potential seismic hazards that might affect development in the state;

inform public officials and industry about potential seismic hazards that might affect development in the state.

History.

(§ 1 ch 93 SLA 1972; am § 2 ch 41 SLA 1977; am § 7 ch 175 SLA 1980; am § 2 ch 101 SLA 1983; am § 4 ch 36 SLA 1987)

Cross references. —

For declaration of legislative policy on geothermal resources, see § 1, ch. 175, SLA 1980, in the Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 41.08.025.
Accounting and disposition of receipts. [Repealed, § 28 ch 90 SLA 1991. For current law, see AS 37.05.142 — 37.05.144.]

Sec. 41.08.030.
Printing and distribution of reports.

The state geologist shall print and publish an annual report and other special and topical reports and maps as may be desirable for the benefit of the state, including the printing or reprinting of reports and maps made by other persons or agencies, where authorization to do so is obtained.

History.

(§ 1 ch 93 SLA 1972; am § 2 ch 27 SLA 2016)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective July 1, 2016, deleted “such” preceding “other special”, deleted the last sentence, related to the sale of reports and maps.

Sec. 41.08.035.
Regulations.

The department may adopt regulations relating to and providing for the systematic collection, recording, and distribution of data on the water of the state.

History.

(§ 3 ch 41 SLA 1977)

Sec. 41.08.040.
Cooperation with other agencies.

The state geologist, with the consent of the commissioner, may enter into cooperative agreements with federal, state, and local governmental agencies to perform geological and geophysical surveys, studies, investigations, and services.

History.

(§ 1 ch 93 SLA 1972)

Sec. 41.08.045.
Fees for facilities, equipment, products, and services.

Except as provided in (c) of this section, the division of geological and geophysical surveys may charge and collect a fee for facilities, equipment, products, or services that the division offers, including

rental of space for confidential sample storage;

rental of sample viewing facilities;

retrieval, cutting, splitting, processing, or sampling of geological materials;

use of equipment, including microscopes; and

analyses, maps, reports, data, or products authorized by the division.

The division of geological and geophysical surveys shall establish fees that may be charged and collected under (a) of this section by regulation. Before setting the fees, the division shall consider, at public hearings, the

cost to the state of operating the facility or providing the service or equipment;

normal fees charged for similar facilities, equipment, or services by governmental and nongovernmental entities;

cost of administering a fee collection program for the facility, equipment, or service; and

public interest.

The division shall waive fees under this section for a student who uses facilities, equipment, products, or services for educational purposes.

Fees collected under this section shall be separately accounted for under AS

37.05.142

.

History.

(§ 3 ch 27 SLA 2016)